Hawaii statutes.
§346-165 Visitation and inspection of group
child care home, group child care center. The department of human services
shall visit and inspect each group child care home and group child care center
as frequently as it deems necessary for the proper operation, sanitation, and
safety of the home or center, as the case may be. The visits and inspections
shall be made at least once annually. Every group child care home and group
child care center licensed under this subpart shall be open to visitation and inspection
by representatives of the department of human services, the department of
education, and the department of health, and by designated representatives of
the respective county fire departments at all times. [L 1985, c 208, pt of §2;
am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L 1998, c 5, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next